Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1626
Report.

Beginning in fiscal year 2021-22, the department shall provide a report to the Governor and the Legislature by September 1 of each year. The report shall evaluate the clinical and financial performance of the pilot program. The report shall be submitted to the Legislature electronically.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 9.